District of Columbia statutes.
7-1303.07

Immediate discharge from facility upon request by individual.

Any individual 14 years of age or older who is admitted to a facility shall have the right to immediate discharge from the facility upon written request to the Director of the facility.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 307, 25 DCR 5094
1981 Ed., § 6-1927.
1973 Ed., § 6-1660.